Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1439.04
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 28-1439.02 to 28-1439.05:

(1) Drug education purposes shall mean drug education activities conducted by the Nebraska State Patrol or other law enforcement agencies in cooperation with elementary and secondary schools in Nebraska; and

(2) Drug enforcement purposes shall include, but not be limited to, the following when used or expended by law enforcement agencies or their agents in discharging their responsibilities concerning traffic in controlled substances and in suppressing the abuse of controlled substances:

(a) Salaries for informants and any expenses of all agents and informants;

(b) Flash money for drug purchases; and

(c) Money for drug purchases.

Laws 1985, LB 247, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 4.